Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2322YH (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. 554 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 9, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) Beginning July 1, 2023 2025 , each school district 3 shall employ either a qualified teacher librarian licensed 4 by the board of educational examiners or a person previously 5 employed as a librarian by a public library . The board of 6 educational examiners shall not require an applicant for a 7 teacher librarian license to have a masterâs degree. 8 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 9, paragraph a, 9 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 10 subparagraph. 11 Sec. 3. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph q, Code 12 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 13 Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraph o, Code 14 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 15 Sec. 5. Section 279.77, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 16 by striking the subsection. 17 Sec. 6. REPEAL. Section 279.81, Code 2025, is repealed. 18